Illinois, session 104th, SB3152.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Wildlife Code is amended by changing 5Section 2.33a as follows: 6    (520 ILCS 5/2.33a)  (from Ch. 61, par. 2.33a)7    Sec. 2.33a. Trapping. 8    (a) It is unlawful to fail to visit and remove all animals 9from traps staked out, set, used, tended, placed or maintained 10at least once each calendar day.11    (b) It is unlawful for any person to place, set, use, or 12maintain a foothold leghold trap or one of similar 13construction on land, that has a jaw spread of larger than 6 141/2 inches (16.6 CM), or a body-gripping trap or one of similar 15construction having a jaw spread larger than 7 inches (17.8 16CM) on a side if square and 8 inches (20.4 CM) if round. The 17diameter of traps shall be measured from the inside edges of 18the outer most portion of the jaws of the trap. 19    (c) It is unlawful for any person to place, set, use, or 20maintain a foothold leghold trap or one of similar 21construction in water, that has a jaw spread of larger than 8 221/2 inches (21.59 CM) 7 1/2 inches (19.1 CM), or a 23body-gripping trap or one of similar construction having a jaw   SB3152 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 18385 WRO 31827 b1spread larger than 10 inches (25.4 CM) on a side if square and 212 inches (30.5 CM) if round. The diameter of traps shall be 3measured from the inside edges of the outer most portion of the 4jaws of the trap perpendicular to the hinges or frame at the 5widest point. 6    (d) It is unlawful to use any trap with saw-toothed, 7spiked, or toothed jaws.8    (e) It is unlawful to destroy, disturb or in any manner 9interfere with dams, lodges, burrows or feed beds of beaver 10while trapping for beaver or to set a trap inside a muskrat 11house or beaver lodge, except that this shall not apply to 12individuals who are acting pursuant to the provisions of 13Section 2.37 or as provided for by administrative rule.14    (f) It is unlawful to trap beaver or river otter with: (1) 15a foothold leghold trap or one of similar construction having 16an inside a jaw spread of less than 5 1/2 inches (13.9 CM) or 17more than 8 1/2 inches(21.59 CM) 7 1/2 inches (19.1 CM), or (2) 18a body-gripping trap or one of similar construction having a 19jaw spread of less than 7 inches (17.7 CM) or more than 10 20inches (25.4 CM) on a side if square and 12 inches (30.5 CM) if 21round, except that these restrictions shall not apply during 22the open season for trapping raccoons. The diameter of traps 23shall be measured from the inside edges of the outer most 24portion of the jaws of the trap perpendicular to the hinges or 25frame at the widest point. 26    (g) It is unlawful to set traps closer than 10 feet (3.05   SB3152 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 18385 WRO 31827 b1M) from any hole or den which may be occupied by a game mammal 2or fur-bearing mammal except that this restriction shall not 3apply to water sets.4    (h) It is unlawful to trap or attempt to trap any 5fur-bearing mammal with any colony, cage, box, or stove-pipe 6trap designed to take more than one mammal at a single setting.7    (i) It is unlawful for any person to set or place any trap 8designed to take any fur-bearing mammal protected by this Act 9during the closed trapping season. Proof that any trap was 10placed during the closed trapping season shall be deemed prima 11facie evidence of a violation of this provision.12    (j) It is unlawful to place, set, or maintain any foothold 13leghold trap or one of similar construction within thirty (30) 14feet (9.14 m) of bait placed in such a manner or position that 15it is not completely covered and concealed from sight, except 16that this shall not apply to underwater sets. Bait shall mean 17and include any bait composed of mammal, bird, or fish flesh, 18fur, hide, entrails or feathers.19    (k) (Blank).20    (l) It is unlawful for any person to place, set, use or 21maintain a snare trap or one of similar construction in water, 22that has a loop diameter exceeding 15 inches (38.1 CM) or a 23cable or wire diameter of more than 1/8 inch (3.2 MM) or less 24than 5/64 inch (2.0 MM), that is constructed of stainless 25steel metal cable or wire, and that does not have a mechanical 26lock, anchor swivel and stop device to prevent the mechanical   SB3152 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 18385 WRO 31827 b1lock from closing the noose loop to a diameter of less than 2 21/2 inches (6.4 CM).3    (m) It is unlawful to trap muskrat or mink with (1) a 4foothold leghold trap or one of similar construction or (2) a 5body-gripping trap or one of similar construction unless the 6body-gripping trap or similar trap is completely submerged 7underwater when set. These restrictions shall not apply during 8the open season for trapping raccoons. 9(Source: P.A. 103-37, eff. 6-9-23.) 10    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 11becoming law.